Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10E-152] Extended coverage. Insurers
seeking to provide multi-peril coverage for residential property after July 1,
2016, shall submit to the commissioner a written request for permission to
write the coverage. The commissioner may disapprove the request. If the
request is disapproved, the insurer shall not write the coverage. [L 2016, c
141, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next